Massachusetts, session 194th, H841.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1 of chapter 51 of the General Laws or any
other general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, any individual aged 16 or 17 years
old residing in the City of Boston, who is ineligible to vote due to age under state law, but who is
otherwise eligible to vote under state law, may upon application have their names entered on a
list of voters established by the board of election commissioners for the City of Boston. Such
individuals on the list of voters may vote in any election for local offices and local ballot
questions in accordance with this Act. For the purposes of this Act, "local voters" are anyone
of 3

who is eligible to vote pursuant to this Act in a local election or upon a local ballot question in
the City of Boston.
SECTION 2.
Said board of election commissioners shall establish a separate registration list for local
voters who shall fill out an alternative registration form. Upon turning eighteen, each local voter
shall be taken off the separate list and notified that he or she must register as a regular voter in
accordance with state law, regulations, and guidelines, in order to be eligible to vote. Said board
shall create and print, at the city of Boston's expense, the special registration form needed for the
purpose of registering local voters.
SECTION 3.
Said board is hereby authorized to promulgate regulations, guidelines and forms to
implement the purpose of this act.
SECTION 4.
If a local ballot question appears on a state election ballot, the board shall print a separate
ballot for the local ballot question at the expense of the City of Boston.
SECTION 5.
The City of Boston is hereby authorized to pass ordinances to implement the purpose of
this act subject to all the provisions of the Boston city charter.
SECTION 6.
of 3

Nothing in this act shall be construed to confer upon local voters the right to vote for any
state or federal office or any state or federal ballot questions.
of 3